Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2517
Petition; signers and circulators; requirements.

Signers and circulators shall comply with sections 32-629 and 32-630.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 17;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 501.